Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 1 Licensing Generally

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions relative to taxation and revenue generally, see art. 15, §§ 1 through 19, Wyo. Const.

As to federal pilot's license under Uniform State Law for Aeronautics, see §

10-4-201

et seq.

For provision requiring license for the sale, transportation, etc., of nursery stock, see §

11-9-102

.

As to licensing of seed dealers, see §

11-12-103

.

For provision requiring distributors of commercial feed to register with department of agriculture, see §

11-13-105

.

As to registration of fertilizer, soil conditioner and soil amendments with department of agriculture before being distributed in the state, see §

11-14-104

.

For provision requiring manufacturer, etc., of livestock remedies to register with commissioner of agriculture, see §

11-17-102

.

As to licensing and regulatory provisions with reference to alcoholic beverages generally, see §

12-4-101

et seq.

As to licensing of agents and salesmen of foreign building and loan associations, see §

13-8-101

.

As to licensing powers of cities and towns generally, see title 15.

For authority of county commissioners to grant licenses for keeping ferries, toll bridges and toll gates, see § 18-3-504(a)(vii).

As to admission of professional personnel of other states, including physicians, dentists, veterinarians, nurses, etc., when disaster conditions prevail, without the normal admissions to practice as required by statute, see §

19-13-115

.

As to licensing of insurance agents, brokers, solicitors, etc., generally, see §

26-9-201

et seq.

As to licensing requirements in relation to public health and safety generally, see title 35.

As to taxation and revenue generally, see title 39.

Stated

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Ass'n of Consulting Eng'rs & Land Surveyors v. Sullivan, 798 P.2d 826,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

51 Am Jur. 2d Licenses and Permits § 1 et seq.

State regulation of liquor sales as affecting municipal power to impose occupational license or tax for revenue, 6 ALR2d 737.

Power of municipality to regulate practice of photography, 7 ALR2d 416.

Business of renting motor vehicles without drivers (drive-it-yourself systems), 7 ALR2d 456.

Failure to obtain occupational or business license or permit as defense to tort action, 13 ALR2d 157.

Application of occupation or license tax to one operating dining room, cafeteria or beverage room incidental to other business, 13 ALR2d 1362.

Penalty for nonpayment of license tax when due as affected by lack of notice to taxpayer, 16 ALR2d 3.

Tourist or trailer camps, motor courts or motels, 22 ALR2d 774.

Plumbers, 22 ALR2d 816.

Provisions as to licensing plumbers, 22 ALR2d 816.

Parking places privately owned, 29 ALR2d 856.

Right of person wrongfully refused license by proper application therefor to do acts for which license is required, 30 ALR2d 1006.

Regulation or licensing of watch making, watch repairing and the like, 34 ALR2d 1326.

Municipality's liability in damages for its refusal to grant permit, license or franchise, 37 ALR2d 694.

Licensing of jewelry auctions, 53 ALR2d 1433.

Right to attack validity of statute, ordinance or regulation relating to occupational or professional license as affected by applying for, or securing, license, 65 ALR2d 660.

Airman's license or certificate, 78 ALR2d 1150.

Payment of license taxes to prevent closing of, or interference with business as involuntary so as to permit recovery, 80 ALR2d 1040.

Statute or other regulation affecting building movers, 83 ALR2d 464.

Garbage or rubbish removal services, 83 ALR2d 799.

Self-service laundries, 87 ALR2d 1007.

Radio and television repairmen and servicemen, 89 ALR2d 1010.

Right to enjoin business competitor from unlicensed or otherwise illegal acts or practices, 90 ALR2d 7.

Correspondence schools or their canvassers or solicitors, 92 ALR2d 522.

Single or isolated transactions as falling within provisions of commercial or occupational licensing requirements, 93 ALR2d 90.

Validity and construction of license tax or fee, or business privilege or occupational tax, on persons engaged in renting or leasing out real estate, 93 ALR2d 1136.

Validity, construction, and application of statutes regulating bail bond business, 13 ALR3d 618.

Authorization, prohibition, or regulation by municipality of the sale of merchandise on streets or highways, or their use for such purpose, 14 ALR3d 896.

Validity and construction of statutes licensing or otherwise regulating operators of polygraph or similar devices, 32 ALR3d 1324.

Recovery back of money paid to unlicensed person required by law to have occupation or business license or permit to make contract, 74 ALR3d 637.

Regulation of private detectives, private investigators, and security agencies, 86 ALR3d 691.

Validity of statutes or ordinances requiring sex-oriented businesses to obtain operating licenses, 8 ALR4th 130.

Validity and construction of state statutory provision forbidding court to stay, pending review, judgment or order revoking or suspending professional, trade or occupational license, 42 ALR4th 516.

Failure of building and construction artisan or contractor to procure business or occupational license as affecting enforceability of contract or right of recovery for work done, 44 ALR4th 271.

Admissibility of evidence of polygraph test results, or offer or refusal to take test, in action for malicious prosecution, 10 ALR5th 663.

Wrongful discharge based on public policy derived from professional ethics codes, 52 ALR5th 405.

53 C.J.S. Licenses § 1 et seq.